Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.260

Recognition and enforcement of interim measures.

(1) An interim measure issued by an arbitral tribunal shall be recognized as binding and, unless otherwise provided by the arbitral tribunal, enforced upon application to the superior court, irrespective of the country in which it was issued, subject to the provisions of RCW 7.05.270.

(2) The party who is seeking or has obtained recognition or enforcement of an interim measure shall promptly inform the court of any termination, suspension, or modification of that interim measure.

(3) The court of the state where recognition or enforcement is sought may, if it considers it proper, order the requesting party to provide appropriate security if the arbitral tribunal has not already made a determination with respect to security or where such a decision is necessary to protect the rights of third parties.

[ 2015 c 276 s 26.]